District of Columbia statutes.
21-1202

Self-administration of medication by program participants.

A program participant may self-administer medication provided that:

(1)

The program participant has been assessed by a registered nurse to have the ability to self-administer medication;

(2)

The self-administration of medication is monitored; and

(3)

The program participant’s self-administration skills include, but are not limited to, orientation to time, knowledge of quantities and proper storage, and understanding of possible medication reactions.

Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 601(b), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 21-1202.